Georgia, session 2025_26, HB886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding state government, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"50-1-14.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Local government entity' means any political subdivision of this state, including any
county, consolidated government, municipality, authority, school district, commission,
H. B. 886
- 1 -

LC 56 0313
board, municipal corporation, governmental unit, sheriff’s office, law enforcement
agency, or any other local public body.
(2) 'Ransomware activity' means restricting access to a computer system or its data,
typically by encrypting such data, with the demand for a ransom payment in exchange
for access restoration.
(3) 'State agency' means any department, agency, board, commission, institution, or other
entity of the executive, legislative, or judicial branches of the state, including public
universities, technical colleges, and other institutions under the state's authority.
(b) No state agency or local government entity in this state shall submit payment to or
otherwise communicate with an individual or organization engaging in ransomware activity
against such state agency or local government entity.
(c) Any state agency or local government entity experiencing ransomware activity
immediately shall consult with the Georgia Technology Authority. The Georgia
Technology Authority shall provide guidance and coordinate the response to such
ransomware activity. The affected state agency or local government entity shall be
required to provide the Georgia Technology Authority with any information required to
appropriately address such response."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 886
- 2 -